Virginia statutes. Title 52. Police (State).
Chapter 7.2. Virginia Senior Alert Program.

§ 52-34.4.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Media”
means print, radio, television, and Internet-based communication systems or other methods of communicating information to the public.

“Missing senior adult”
means an adult whose whereabouts are unknown and who is over 60 years of age and suffers a cognitive impairment to the extent that he is unable to provide care to himself without assistance from a caregiver, including a diagnosis of Alzheimer’s Disease or dementia, and whose disappearance poses a credible threat as determined by a law-enforcement agency to the health and safety of the adult and under such other circumstances as deemed appropriate by the Virginia State Police.

“Senior alert”
means the notice of a missing senior adult provided to the public by the media or other methods under a Senior Alert Agreement.

“Senior Alert Agreement”
means a voluntary agreement between law-enforcement officials and members of the media whereby a senior adult will be declared missing, and the public will be notified by media outlets, and includes all other incidental conditions of the partnership as found appropriate by the Virginia State Police.

“Senior Alert Program”
or

“Program”

means the procedures and Senior Alert Agreements to aid in the identification and location of a missing senior adult.

History.

2007, cc. 486, 723.

Cross references.

As to obtaining records concerning electronic communications service or remote computing service during investigation involving a missing senior, see §

19.2-70.3

.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 52-34.5.
Establishment of the Virginia Senior Alert Program.

The Virginia State Police shall develop policies for the establishment of uniform standards for the creation of Senior Alert Programs throughout the Commonwealth. The Virginia State Police shall (i) inform local law-enforcement officials of the policies and procedures to be used for the Senior Alert Programs; (ii) assist in determining the geographic scope of a particular Senior Alert; and (iii) establish procedures and standards by which a local law-enforcement agency shall verify that a senior adult is missing and shall report such information to the Virginia State Police.

The establishment of a Senior Alert Program by a local law-enforcement agency and the media is voluntary, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to be a mandate that local officials or the media establish or participate in a Senior Alert Program.

History.

2007, cc. 486, 723.

§ 52-34.6.
Activation of Senior Alert Program upon an incident of a missing senior adult.

Upon receipt of a notice of a missing senior adult from a law-enforcement agency, the Virginia State Police shall confirm the accuracy of the information and provide assistance in the activation of the Senior Alert Program as the investigation dictates.

Senior Alerts may be local, regional, or statewide. The initial decision to make a local Senior Alert shall be at the discretion of the local law-enforcement official. Prior to making a local Senior Alert, the local law-enforcement official shall confer with the Virginia State Police and provide information regarding the missing senior adult to the Virginia State Police. The decision to make a regional or statewide Senior Alert shall be at the discretion of the Virginia State Police.

The Senior Alert shall include the missing senior adult information as defined in §

15.2-1718.1

and any other such information as the law-enforcement agency deems appropriate that will assist in the safe recovery of the missing senior adult.

The Senior Alert shall be cancelled under the terms of the Senior Alert Agreement. Any local law-enforcement agency that locates a missing senior adult who is the subject of an alert shall notify the Virginia State Police immediately that the missing senior adult has been located.

History.

2007, cc. 486, 723.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 755 and 796, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. No state or local government department, agency, or instrumentality having jurisdiction over criminal law enforcement or regulatory violations, including but not limited to the Department of State Police, and no department of law enforcement as defined in §

15.2-836

of the Code of Virginia of any county, city, or town shall utilize an unmanned aircraft system before July 1, 2015.

“Notwithstanding the prohibition in this section, an unmanned aircraft system may be deployed before July 1, 2015, (i) when an Amber Alert is activated pursuant to §

52-34.3

of the Code of Virginia, (ii) when a Senior Alert is activated pursuant to §

52-34.6

of the Code of Virginia, (iii) when a Blue Alert is activated pursuant to §

52-34.9

of the Code of Virginia, (iv) for the purpose of a search or rescue operation where use of an unmanned aircraft system is determined to be necessary to alleviate an immediate danger to any person, or (v) for training exercises related to such uses. In no case may a weaponized unmanned aircraft system be deployed or its use facilitated by a state or local agency in Virginia.

“The prohibitions in this section shall not apply to the Virginia National Guard while utilizing unmanned aircraft systems during training required to maintain readiness for its federal mission, when facilitating training for other United States Department of Defense units, or when such systems are utilized to support the Commonwealth for purposes other than law enforcement, including damage assessment, traffic assessment, flood stages, and wildfire assessment. Nothing herein shall prohibit use of unmanned aircraft systems solely for research and development purposes by institutions of higher education and other research organizations or institutions.”

Acts 2013, cc. 755 and 796, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Criminal Justice Services, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General and other state agencies, shall develop model protocols for use of unmanned aircraft systems by law-enforcement agencies and shall report such findings to the Governor and the General Assembly on or before November 1, 2013.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Unmanned aircraft system. —

Based on the accepted industry definition of an “unmanned aircraft system” and legislative intent, Acts 2013, cc. 755 and 796 (as noted under this section), which is effective until July 1, 2015, temporarily prohibits the use of even a single remotely controlled aerial vehicle by state or local law enforcement for the purpose of gathering evidence pursuant to a search warrant. Chapter 755, however, does not prohibit the use of unmanned aircraft systems for specified humanitarian purposes. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Ronald K. Elkins, Commonwealth’s Attorney, Wise County & City of Norton, No. 14-051, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 59 (10/9/14).